Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-355
Aquatic Invasive Species Program; activities authorized.

The Aquatic Invasive Species Program is created. Funds identified to support the program shall be used for aquatic invasive species activities which may include monitoring and sampling waters of the state for aquatic invasive species, hiring personnel, purchasing equipment to inspect and decontaminate conveyances, providing additional enforcement, education, and research relating to aquatic invasive species, and conducting aquatic invasive species projects as needed.

Laws 2015, LB142, § 2.